Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-105
Code; general and special provisions.

In the construction of this code each general provision shall be controlled by a special provision on the same subject, if there is a conflict.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 250, p. 782;

R.S.1913, § 8905;

C.S.1922, § 9926;

C.S.1929, § 29-105;

R.S.1943, § 29-105.

Penal statute applies only to persons clearly within its terms. State v. Dailey, 76 Neb. 770, 107 N.W. 1094 (1906).